Hawaii statutes.
[§269-16.93] Release of domestic
violence victims from shared wireless plans. (a) All wireless
telecommunications service providers shall release, without charge, penalty, or
fee, any victim of domestic violence from a shared or family wireless service
contract involving the victim's abuser; provided that the victim submits an
opt-out request in writing and with evidence of domestic violence as documented
by any of the following items:

(1) Valid police report documenting an instance or
series of instances of domestic violence;

(2) Order for protection granted pursuant to chapter
586; or

(3) Signed affidavit from a licensed medical or
mental health care provider, employee of a court acting within the scope of
their employment, or social worker.

(b) Any victim of domestic violence who
submits an opt-out request to a wireless telecommunications service provider
pursuant to subsection (a) may further request a substitute or new phone number
or alternative telecommunications service. Upon such request, the wireless
telecommunications service provider shall provide a substitute or new phone
number or alternative telecommunications service without charge, penalty, or
fee and within twenty-four hours from the time the opt-out request is submitted
to the wireless telecommunications service provider.

(c) For purposes of this section:

"Domestic violence" shall have the
same meaning as in section 321-471.

"Wireless telecommunications service"
shall have the same meaning as "commercial mobile radio service" as
defined in title 47 Code of Federal Regulations section 20.3.

"Wireless telecommunications service
provider" means a provider of wireless telecommunications service. [L
2015, c 219, §2]

Cross References

Transfer or release of domestic violence victims from shared
wireless plans, see §586-5.8.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next